Arkansas, session 2025, HB1715.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 26-26-1118, concerning limitations on the
increase in the assessed value of property, is amended to add an additional
subsection to read as follows:
(c)(1) When real property is sold or otherwise transferred, for the
first assessment following the sale or other transfer, the assessed value of
the real property is limited to not more than:
(A) Five percent (5%) above the taxable value of the real
property if the real property is a taxpayer's homestead and is used as the
taxpayer's principal place of residence; or
(B) Ten percent (10%) above the taxable value of the real
property if the real property is not a taxpayer's homestead used as the
taxpayer's principal place of residence.
(2) As used in this subsection, "taxable value" means the value
on which the seller of the real property is assessed property tax as of the
date of the sale or other transfer of the real property.
*JLL283*
03/07/2025 3:29:41 PM JLL283

HB1715

SECTION 2. Section 1 of this act is effective for assessment years
beginning on or after January 1, 2026.

































03/07/2025 3:29:41 PM JLL283